Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-1843
Municipality; duty to provide quarters and equipment; failure; effect.

The governing body of every municipality subject to the Civil Service Act shall provide the commission with suitable and convenient rooms and accommodations and cause the same to be furnished, heated, lighted, and supplied with all office supplies and equipment necessary to carry on the business of the commission and with such clerical assistance as may be necessary, all of which is to be commensurate with the number of persons in each such municipality subject to the Civil Service Act. Failure upon the part of the governing body to do so shall be a violation of the Civil Service Act and shall be punishable as such.

Laws 1943, c. 29, § 18, p. 137;

R.S.1943, § 19-1818;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 19-1818;

Laws 1985, LB 372, § 22.